Alaska statutes. Title 42. Public Utilities and Carriers and Energy Programs.
Article 5. Joint Action Agencies.

Sec. 42.45.300.
Joint action agencies.

Two or more public utilities may form a joint action agency for the purpose of participation in the design, construction, operation, and maintenance of a generating or transmission facility and to secure financing for carrying out the design, construction, operation, and maintenance of the facility. A joint action agency may request the Alaska Industrial Development and Export Authority to issue revenue bonds for projects of the agency. A joint action agency has the powers of a public utility under AS 42.05.

History.

(§ 5 ch 18 SLA 1993)

Sec. 42.45.310.
Acquisition of power project.

Two or more public utilities that purchase power from a power project acquired or constructed as part of the former energy program for the state and owned by the authority under AS

44.83.396

may form a joint action agency under AS

42.45.300

and under this section to purchase the power project from the authority if the purchase and sale of the project has first been authorized by law.

The agency may

acquire, own, operate, and manage one or more power projects or generating or transmission facilities; and

participate in the design, development, construction, operation, and maintenance of a generating or transmission facility.

The agency is a body corporate and politic and an instrumentality of the public utilities that form the agency, but has a separate and independent legal existence from the public utilities. A debt, obligation, or liability of the agency does not constitute a debt, obligation, or liability of a public utility or the state. A liability incurred by the agency shall be satisfied exclusively from the assets or revenue of the agency, and a creditor of the agency or any other person does not have any right of action or claim against a public utility or the state, because of a debt, obligation, or liability of the agency. The agency has the powers of a public utility under AS 42.05 and the immunities of a public utility. In addition to the powers granted to the agency under AS

42.45.300

and this section, the agency has the power

to adopt bylaws of the agency;

to sue and be sued;

to carry out the authorized purposes of the agency;

subject to (e) of this section, to issue revenue bonds and other obligations that are not obligations of either the state or the public utilities that are parties to the agency agreement to provide financing to carry out the authorized purposes of the agency;

in addition to the powers of eminent domain in AS

42.05.631

, to exercise the powers of eminent domain and a declaration of taking to acquire land or materials within the boundaries of the power project purchased by the agency from the authority under the procedures set out in AS

09.55.240

—

09.55.460

to carry out the authorized purposes of a joint action agency; and

to use facilities, projects, and related assets owned, leased, or operated by the joint action agency as security in accordance with applicable law.

The agency is created by a written agreement among the public utilities forming the agency. Each public utility forming the agency shall adopt the terms of the agreement by ordinance or resolution. After the public utilities that are parties to the agency agreement adopt and execute the agreement, the board of directors of the agency shall file the agency agreement with the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development. Subject to (c) of this section, the agency agreement may define the powers, functions, and activities of the agency and specify the means by which they shall be performed. The agency agreement may establish the rights and responsibilities of the public utilities that form the agency. If applicable, the agency agreement must provide for

apportionment between the public utilities that are parties to the agency agreement of responsibility for expenses incurred in the performance of the functions or activities;

apportionment of fees or other revenue derived from the functions or activities and the manner in which the revenue shall be accounted for;

the transfer of personnel and the preservation of employment benefits; and

the rights of the public utilities that are parties to the agency agreement to terminate the agreement, subject to (e) of this section, including resolving disputes if the public utilities are unable, upon termination of the agency agreement, to agree on the transfer of personnel or the division of assets and liabilities between the parties to the agreement.

The public utilities that are parties to the agency agreement shall pledge and agree with the holders of revenue bonds or other obligations issued by the agency, including with a state entity that provides financing to the agency, that the public utilities and the agency will not terminate the agency or take any other action that would limit or alter the rights and powers vested in the agency by this section to fulfill the terms of a contract made by the agency with the holders of the bonds or other obligations and that the public utilities and the agency will not in any way impair the rights and remedies of the holders until the bonds or other obligations, together with the interest on them with interest on unpaid installments of interest, and all costs and expenses in connection with an action or proceeding by or on behalf of the holders of the bonds or other obligations are fully met and discharged. The agency may include this pledge and agreement of the public utilities and the agency, insofar as it refers to holders of bonds and other obligations of the agency, in a contract with the holders and, insofar as it relates to a state entity, in a contract with the state entity.

Bonds and other obligations issued by the agency and all interest and income from them and all fees, charges, funds, revenue, income, and other money pledged or available to pay or secure the payment of the bonds or obligations or interest on them are exempt from taxation. The real and personal property of the agency and the assets, income, and receipts of the agency are exempt from all taxes and special assessments of the state or a political subdivision of the state, except that electricity sold at retail by an agency is subject to the electric cooperative tax (AS

10.25.540

—

10.25.570

).

A loan to, investment in, or other financial assistance provided to the agency by the state or any political subdivision of the state does not constitute a violation of AS

37.10.085

.

An agency formed by, and that continues to include, one or more municipal public utilities is a political subdivision for purposes of AS

38.05.810

, and functions as a political subdivision in the acquisition and ownership of the power project under the agreement authorized by this section. Except as provided in this subsection, the agency is not a political subdivision of the state.

The agency may not sell a project owned by the agency to any purchaser without the approval of the legislature in advance of the effective date of the sale, except that a sale made to a public utility that is a party to the agreement does not require legislative approval.

Notwithstanding (i) of this section, the project and related assets may be transferred in connection with a foreclosure or other enforcement of a lien or security interest to a party holding a lien or security interest acquired under (c)(6) of this section or to another party without legislative approval. A party obtaining a property interest under this subsection may transfer that interest without legislative approval.

In this section,

“agency” means a joint action agency formed under this section;

“agency agreement” or “agreement” means the written agreement described in (d) of this section between or among the public utilities creating a joint action agency;

“parties to the agency agreement” means those public utilities that initially form the agency and,

in the event of a permitted withdrawal of a public utility from the agency in accordance with the terms of the agency agreement, those public utilities that remain parties to the agency agreement; and

if authorized by law, includes an additional public utility that becomes a party to the agency agreement;

“public utility” has the meaning given the term in AS

42.05.990

;

“state entity” means a state department, authority, or other administrative unit of the executive branch of state government.

History.

(§ 10 ch 60 SLA 2000; am §§ 5 — 12 ch 4 SLA 2001; am §§ 1 — 3 ch 100 SLA 2004; am §§
97, 98 ch 13 SLA 2019)

Revisor's notes. —

Subsections (i) and (j) were enacted as (j) and (k) and relettered in 2004, at which time former subsection (i) was redesignated subsection (k).
The paragraphs in subsection (k) were renumbered in 2001 to alphabetize the defined terms.

In 2004, in (d) of this section, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2019 amendment, effective October 17, 2019, in (a), substituted “the state” for “Alaska” following “former energy program for” and twice substituted “authority” for “Alaska Energy Authority”; and in (c)(5), substituted “authority” for “Alaska Energy Authority” following “the agency from the”.

Sec. 42.45.320.
Liability, indemnification, and insurance.

A protected person is not individually liable for conduct performed within the scope of the person’s duties for the agency. However, the protected person may be held individually liable for conduct if it was not reasonable for the person to believe that the conduct was in, or not contrary to, the best interests of the agency.

Unless prohibited by the agency agreement, the agency shall indemnify a protected person who is or may be made a party to a contested matter arising out of acts or omissions within the scope of the person’s duties for the agency against expenses actually and reasonably incurred in connection with the contested matter. However, the agency may not indemnify the protected person if the person did not reasonably believe the conduct to be in, or not opposed to, the best interests of the agency. With respect to a criminal action or proceeding, the agency shall indemnify a protected person unless the person had reasonable cause to believe that the conduct was unlawful.

An agency may purchase and maintain insurance on behalf of a protected person against liability asserted against the protected person and incurred in an official capacity or arising out of the person’s status.

In this section,

“agency” means a joint action agency formed under AS

42.45.310

;

“conduct” includes action, inaction, and omission;

“contested matter” means a proposed, pending, or completed action or proceeding, whether civil, criminal, administrative, or investigative;

“expenses” include attorney fees, judgments, fines, and amounts paid in settlement;

“protected person” means a director, officer, employee, or agent of an agency.

History.

(§ 13 ch 4 SLA 2001)